Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9088. CALHOUN COUNTY WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9088.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "District" means the Calhoun County Water Control and Improvement District No. 1 in Calhoun County.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 3530), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2023.

Sec. 9088.0102. NATURE AND PURPOSE OF DISTRICT. (a) The district is:

(1) a conservation and reclamation district under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution;

(2) a water control and improvement district; and

(3) a municipal corporation.

(b) The district's sole purpose is reclaiming and draining the district's overflowed land and other land needing drainage.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 3530), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2023.

Sec. 9088.0103. FINDINGS OF PURPOSE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is essential to the accomplishment of the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(b) All land and other property in the district benefit from the district and improvements and facilities the district constructs and acquires.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 3530), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2023.

Sec. 9088.0104. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district has the area and boundaries described by the board's order adopted on March 23, 1959, as that area and those boundaries may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 3530), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9088.0201. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT POWERS. To accomplish the sole purpose of reclaiming and draining the district's overflowed land and other land needing drainage, the district has all of the rights, powers, privileges, and duties provided by general law applicable to a water control and improvement district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 3530), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9088.0301. TAX METHOD. (a) The district shall use the ad valorem basis or plan of taxation.

(b) The board is not required to hold a hearing on the adoption of a plan of taxation.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 3530), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2023.